Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3910
Duration of abduction prevention order.

An abduction prevention order remains in effect until the earliest of:

(1) the time stated in the order;

(2) the emancipation of the child;

(3) the child's attaining eighteen years of age; or

(4) the time the order is modified, revoked, vacated, or superseded by a court with jurisdiction under sections 43-1238 to 43-1240.

Laws 2007, LB341, § 10.